en: Fish in puff pastry
fr: Feuilletés au poisson

en: Stuffed vine leaves
de: Gefüllte Weinblätter
fr: Feuilles de vigne farcies
hr: Nadjeveno lišće vinove loze
nl: Gevulde wijnbladeren

en: Dolmas, Vine leaf stuffed with rice, Drained vine leaf stuffed with rice
fr: Dolmas, Feuille de vigne farcie au riz, Feuille de vigne égouttée farcie au riz
hr: Dolme
nl: Dolma's

en: Chaat
ar: جات
as: চাট
bn: চাট
de: Chat
es: Chaat
fr: Chaat
gu: ચાટ
hi: चाट
hr: Brbljati
it: Chaat
jv: Chaat
kn: ಚಾಟ್
ko: 차트
pa: ਚਾਟ
uk: Чаат

en: Dal Baati Churma, Dal Bati Churma
bn: ডাল বাটি চুরমা
gu: દાલ બાટી ચૂરમા
hi: दाल बाटी चूरमा
kn: ದಾಲ್ ಬಾಟಿ ಚೂರ್ಮಾ
ml: ദാൽ ബാറ്റി ചൂർമ
mr: डाळ बाटी चूरमा
pa: ਦਾਲ ਬਾਟੀ ਚੂਰਮਾ
ta: தால் பாட்டி சூர்மா
te: దాల్ బాటి చూర్మా

en: Frozen salsify
fr: Salsifis surgelés
hr: Smrznuti salsify
nl: Diepvriesschorseneren

en: Frozen raw salsify
fr: Salsifis surgelés crus
hr: Smrznuti sirovi salsify
nl: Diepvriesschorseneren(rauw)

en: Canned flat green beans
es: Judías verdes enlatadas
fr: Haricots verts plats en conserve
hr: Konzervirani plosnati zeleni grah
nl: Snijbonen in blik/pot

en: Vegetable cakes, Vegetables cakes
fi: kasvispihvit
fr: Cakes aux légumes, Cake aux legumes
hr: Kolači od povrća
it: Torte vegetali
ja: 野菜ケーキ
nl: Groentencakes

en: vegetables macedoines, Prepared vegetables macedoines
es: Macedonia de verduras
fr: Macédoines de légumes, Macédoines de légumes préparées
hr: Povrće macedoines
nl: Bereide macedoine groenten

en: Vegetable risottos, Risotto with vegetables
de: Gemüserisotto
es: Risottos de verduras
fr: Risottos aux légumes, Risotto aux légumes
hr: Rižota od povrća
it: Risotto alle verdure
nl: Groenterisotto

en: Mushroom risottos, Mushrooms risottos
de: Pilzrisotto, Pilz-Risotto
es: Risottos de champiñones
fr: Risottos aux champignons
hr: Rižoto od gljiva
it: Risotti ai funghi
nl: Paddenstoelrisotto

en: Risottos with porcini mushrooms
fr: Risottos aux cèpes

xx: Dumplings
en: Dumplings
lt: Koldūnai
sv: Dumplingar

en: Dumplings with vegetables
da: Dumplings med grøntsager
lt: Koldūnai su daržovėmis
nb: Dumplings med grønnsaker
sv: Dumplingar med grönsaker, Dumplings med grönsaker

xx: Empanadas
en: Empanadas
es: Empanadas, Empanadillas

en: Chinese dumplings, Chinese dumpling, Dim Sum, Chinese raviolis
fi: Kiinalaiset mykyt, Kiinalainen myky
fr: Bouchées à la vapeur chinoises, Bouchées à la vapeur chinoises cuites, Bouchées vapeur chinoises cuites, Bouchées à la vapeur
hr: Kineske knedle
pl: Chińskie pierogi

en: Frozen dumplings
da: Frosne dumplings
sv: Frysta dumplingar

en: Frozen dumplings with vegetables
da: Frosne dumplings med grøntsager
sv: Frysta dumplingar med grönsaker

en: Frozen Chinese dumplings, frozen Dim Sum
fr: Bouchées à la vapeur chinoises cuites surgelées, Bouchées à la vapeur surgelées, Dim Sum surgelés